tools/nvda/louis/tables/cy-cy-g1.utb
# liblouis: Welsh Grade 1 table
#
# ------------
#-index-name: Welsh, uncontracted
#-display-name: Welsh uncontracted braille
#
#+language:cy
#+type:literary
#+contraction:no
#+grade:1
#
# TODO: Please correct the metadata above. It is not meant to be
# accurate nor complete. It hasn't been verified by the table
# author yet. It is merely an attempt by the liblouis maintainers
# to get some sensible initial values in place.
#
# TODO: Please add a reference to official documentation about
# the implemented braille code. Preferably submit the documents
# to https://github.com/liblouis/braille-specs.
# ------------

# Based on the braille contraction modules in BRLTTY
#
# Copyright (C) 1995-2004 by The BRLTTY Team.
# Copyright (C) 2004 ViewPlus Technologies, inc.,  www.viewplustech.com
# Copyright (C) 2004 Computers to Help People, Inc., www.chpi.org

# This file is free software; you can redistribute it and/or
# modify it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public
# License as published by the Free Software Foundation; either
# version 2.1 of the License, or (at your option) any later version.

# This file is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the GNU
# Lesser General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
# License along with this file; if not, write to the Free Software
# Foundation, Inc., 51 Franklin Street, Fifth Floor, Boston, MA  02110-1301  USA

include text_nabcc.dis All display opcodes

space \t 9 tab
space \x001b 1b escape character for html back-translation
space \x00A0 a NO-BREAK SPACE <noBreak> 0020 NON-BREAKING SPACE 
include spaces.uti

include loweredDigits6Dots.uti
include latinLetterDef6Dots.uti
include latinUppercaseComp6.uti

punctuation ( 12356
punctuation } 12456
punctuation ] 124567
punctuation ? 1456
punctuation : 156
punctuation ) 23456
punctuation ! 2346
punctuation { 246
punctuation [ 2467
punctuation ' 3
punctuation - 36
punctuation . 46
punctuation " 5
punctuation ; 56
punctuation , 6
sign & 12346
sign $ 1246
sign | 1256
sign \\ 12567
sign % 146
sign * 16
sign # 3456
punctuation ` 4
sign _ 456
sign ^ 457
sign @ 47
math = 123456
math < 126
math / 34
math > 345
math + 346
math ~ 45

# Miscellaneous
math \x00B1 346-36 PLUS-MINUS SIGN PLUS-OR-MINUS SIGN 
math \x00B7 16 MIDDLE DOT 
math \x00BC 1456-2-34-256-3456 VULGAR FRACTION ONE QUARTER No 0031 2044 
math \x00BD 1456-2-34-23-3456 VULGAR FRACTION ONE HALF No 0031 2044 0032 
math \x00BE 1456-25-34-23-3456 VULGAR FRACTION THREE QUARTERS No 0033 
math \x00D7 4-16 MULTIPLICATION SIGN 
math \x00F7 46-34 DIVISION SIGN 
punctuation \x0092 3
punctuation \x0097 36-36
punctuation \x00A1 235 INVERTED EXCLAMATION MARK 
punctuation \x00ad 36
punctuation \x00BF 236 INVERTED QUESTION MARK 
punctuation \x2011 36
punctuation \x2013 36-36
punctuation \x2014 36-36
punctuation \x2018 6-236
punctuation \x2019 3
punctuation \x2019 356-3
punctuation \x201c 236
punctuation \x201d 356
punctuation \x2026 3
sign \x2122 45-2345 trademark sign
sign \x00A2 4-14 CENT SIGN 
sign \x00A3 3456 POUND SIGN 
sign \x00A4 1246 CURRENCY SIGN 
sign \x00A7 4-234 SECTION SIGN 
sign \x00A9 45-14 COPYRIGHT SIGN 
sign \x00AE 45-1235 REGISTERED SIGN REGISTERED TRADE MARK SIGN 
sign \x00B0 56-145-1245 DEGREE SIGN 
sign \x00B4 b4 ACUTE ACCENT 0020 0301 SPACING ACUTE 
sign \x00B5 46-134 MICRO SIGN 03BC 039C 039C
sign \x00A5 4-13456 YEN SIGN 
punctuation \x00A6 456-1256 BROKEN BAR BROKEN VERTICAL BAR 
# sign \x00A8 DIAERESIS 0020 0308 SPACING DIAERESIS 
# sign \x00AA FEMININE ORDINAL INDICATOR 0061 
# punctuation \x00AB LEFT-POINTING DOUBLE ANGLE QUOTATION MARK LEFT 
# sign \x00AC NOT SIGN 
# sign \x00AF MACRON 0020 0304 SPACING MACRON 
# math \x00B2 SUPERSCRIPT TWO 0032 2 2 SUPERSCRIPT DIGIT TWO 
# math \x00B3 SUPERSCRIPT THREE 0033 3 3 SUPERSCRIPT DIGIT THREE 
sign \x00B6 1234-345 PILCROW SIGN PARAGRAPH SIGN 
# sign \x00B8 CEDILLA 0020 0327 SPACING CEDILLA 
# math \x00B9 SUPERSCRIPT ONE 0031 1 1 SUPERSCRIPT DIGIT ONE 
sign \x00BA 145-1245 MASCULINE ORDINAL INDICATOR 006F 
# punctuation \x00BB RIGHT-POINTING DOUBLE ANGLE QUOTATION MARK Pf Y 

punctuation \x2010 36			# 8208  hyphen
punctuation	\x201F 356		# 8223	smart double high reverse quotation mark
punctuation	\x201E 236		# 8222	smart double low quotation mark

noback sign \x25CF 16 black circle

# Braille indicators
numsign 3456  number sign, just a dots operand
multind 56-6 letsign capsletter
letsign 56
capsletter 6
begcapsword 6-6
endcapsword 6-3
emphclass italic
emphclass underline
emphclass bold
begemph italic 46
endemph italic 46-3
begemph bold 46-46
endemph bold 46-3
begcomp 6-346
endcomp 6-346

# the decimal digits
include litdigits6Dots.uti

# Letters not defined in en-chardefs
always ch 16
always th 1456

#single letter words
word a 1
word A 1
word i 24
word I 24
word o 135
word O 135
word y 13456
word Y 13456

# punctuation
prepunc " 236
postpunc " 356
noback always " 5
prepunc ' 6-236
postpunc ' 356-3
postpunc '' 356
postpunc ''' 356-3-356

noback always ' 3
midnum , 3
noback always , 2
midnum . 2
decpoint . 2
noback always . 256
noback always ; 23
midnum : 6-25
noback always : 25
endnum ! 6-235
noback always ! 235
always # 4-3456
midnum / 456-34-3456
always / 456-34
noback always ? 236
endnum % 0-25-1234
always % 25-1234
midnum ^ 346-3456
always ^ 456-126
always ~ 4-156
always & 4-12346
midnum * 0-56-236-3456
always * 35-35
repeated *** 35-35-0-35-35-0-35-35
prepunc ( 2356
postpunc ) 2356
always [ 6-2356
always ] 2356-3
always { 46-2356
always } 46-2356
always -com =
endword -to = pointed-to resource
endword -by = used-by
# always _ 78
prepunc `` 236
prepunc ` 6-236
noback always ` 4
noback always @ 2346
always \\ 5-16
always | 5-123
repeated --- 36-36-36

# repeated ___ 78-78-78
repeated ___ 46-46-46

repeated ::: 25-25-25

repeated === 56-2356-56-2356-56-2356
repeated ~~~ 4-156-4-156-4-156
always \s-\s 36-36
always \s-\scom 36-36-14-135-134
always ... 3-3-3
always .\s.\s. 3-3-3 . . .
# always  \x2026 3-3-3 # 8230			MS Word smart ellipsis

# the hyphen
# always ­ 36
repeated ­­­ 36-36-36
always \s­\s 36-36

# accented letters

lowercase \x00E0 1				# a with grave
lowercase \x00E1 1				# a with acute
lowercase \x00E2 1				# a with circumflex
#uplow \x00C3 \x00E3 1				# a with tilde
lowercase \x00E4 1				# a with dieresis
#uplow \x00C5 \x00E5 1				# a with ring above
lowercase \x00E6 1				# letter ae
#uplow \x00C7 \x00E7 14				# c with cedilla
lowercase \x00E8 15				# e with grave
lowercase \x00E9 15				# e with acute
lowercase \x00EA 15				# e with circumflex
lowercase \x00EB 15				# e with dieresis
lowercase \x00EC 24				# i with grave above
lowercase \x00ED 24				# i with acute above
lowercase \x00EE 24				# i with circumflex
lowercase \x00EF 24				# i with dieresis
#uplow \x00D0 \x00F0 15				# letter eth
#uplow \x00D1 \x00F1 1345			# n with tilde
lowercase \x00F2 135			# o with grave above
lowercase \x00F3 135			# o with acute above
lowercase \x00F4 135			# o with circumflex
lowercase \x00F5 135			# o with tilde
lowercase \x00F6 135			# o with dieresis
# \x00D7	× multiplication sign	----------------------
#uplow \x00D8 \x00F8 135			# o with stroke
lowercase \x00F9 136			# u with grave above
lowercase \x00FA 136			# u with acute above
lowercase \x00FB 136			# u with circumflex above
lowercase \x00FC 136				# u with dieeresis
lowercase \x00FD 13456		# y with acute above
#uplow \x00DE \x00FE 2345			# letter thorn
letter \x00DF 2346		# small sharp s
lowercase \x0175 2456 w with circumflex
lowercase \x0177 13456 # y with circumflex
lowercase \x00ff 13456 # y with diaeresis
lowercase \x1ef3 13456 # y with grave

# Uppercase letters
base uppercase \x00C0 \x00E0  # a with grave
base uppercase \x00C1 \x00E1  # a with acute
base uppercase \x00C2 \x00E2  # a with circumflex
base uppercase \x00C4 \x00E4  # a with dieresis
base uppercase \x00C6 \x00E6  # letter ae
base uppercase \x00C8 \x00E8  # e with grave
base uppercase \x00C9 \x00E9  # e with acute
base uppercase \x00CA \x00EA  # e with circumflex
base uppercase \x00CB \x00EB  # e with dieresis
base uppercase \x00CC \x00EC  # i with grave above
base uppercase \x00CD \x00ED  # i with acute above
base uppercase \x00CE \x00EE  # i with circumflex
base uppercase \x00CF \x00EF  # i with dieresis
base uppercase \x00D2 \x00F2  # o with grave above
base uppercase \x00D3 \x00F3  # o with acute above
base uppercase \x00D4 \x00F4  # o with circumflex
base uppercase \x00D6 \x00F6  # o with dieresis
base uppercase \x00D9 \x00F9  # u with grave above
base uppercase \x00DA \x00FA  # u with acute above
base uppercase \x00DB \x00FB  # u with circumflex above
base uppercase \x00DC \x00FC  # u with dieeresis
base uppercase \x00DD \x00FD  # y with acute above
base uppercase \x0174 \x0175  # w with circumflex
base uppercase \x0176 \x0177  # y with circumflex
base uppercase \x0178 \x00ff  # y with diaeresis
base uppercase \x1ef2 \x1ef3  # y with grave

largesign \x00C0 23-1      [C0] upper a grave
largesign \x00E0   23-1      [E0] lower a grave

largesign \x00C1 25-1      [C1] upper a acute
largesign \x00E1   25-1      [E1] lower a acute

largesign \x00C2 4-1      [C2] upper a circumflex
largesign \x00E2   4-1      [E2] lower a circumflex

#largesign \x00C3 4-1      [C3] upper a tilde
#largesign \x00E3   4-1      [E3] lower a tilde

largesign \x00C4 45-1      [C4] upper a dieresis
largesign \x00E4   45-1      [E4] lower a dieresis

#largesign \x00C5 4-1      [C5] upper a ring
#largesign \x00E5   4-1      [E5] lower a ring

largesign \x00C6 1-15     [C6] upper ae
largesign \x00E6   1-15			[E6] lower ae

#largesign \x00C7 4-14     [C7] upper c cedilla
#largesign \x00E7   4-14     [E7] lower c cedilla

largesign \x00C8 23-15     [C8] upper e grave
largesign \x00E8   23-15     [E8] lower e grave

largesign \x00C9 25-15     [C9] upper e acute
largesign \x00E9   25-15     [E9] lower e acute

largesign \x00CA 4-15     [CA] upper e circumflex
largesign \x00EA   4-15     [EA] lower e circumflex

largesign \x00CB 45-15     [CB] upper e dieresis
largesign \x00EB   45-15     [EB] lower e dieresis

largesign \x00CC 23-24     [CC] upper i grave
largesign \x00EC   23-24     [EC] lower i grave

largesign \x00CD 25-24     [CD] upper i acute
largesign \x00ED   25-24     [ED] lower i acute

largesign \x00CE 4-24     [CE] upper i circumflex
largesign \x00EE   4-24     [EE] lower i circumflex

largesign \x00CF 45-24     [CF] upper i dieresis
largesign \x00EF   45-24     [EF] lower i dieresis

#largesign \x00D0 4-15     [D0] upper eth
#largesign \x00F0   4-15     [F0] lower eth

#largesign \x00D1 4-1345   [D1] upper n tilde
#largesign \x00F1   4-1345   [F1] lower n tilde

largesign \x00D2 23-135    [D2] upper o grave
largesign \x00F2   23-135    [F2] lower o grave

largesign \x00D3 25-135    [D3] upper o acute
largesign \x00F3   25-135    [F3] lower o acute

largesign \x00D4 4-135    [D4] upper o circumflex
largesign \x00F4   4-135    [F4] lower o circumflex

#largesign \x00D5 4-135    [D5] upper o tilde
#largesign \x00F5   4-135    [F5] lower o tilde

largesign \x00D6 45-135    [D6] upper o dieresis
largesign \x00F6   45-135			[F6] lower o dieresis

#largesign \x00D8 4-135    [D8] upper o slash
#largesign \x00f8   4-135    [F8] lower o slash

largesign \x00D9 23-136    [D9] upper u grave
largesign \x00F9   23-136    [F9] lower u grave

largesign \x00DA 25-136    [DA] upper u acute
largesign \x00FA   25-136    [FA] lower u acute

largesign \x00DB 4-136    [DB] upper u circumflex
largesign \x00FB   4-136    [FB] lower u circumflex

largesign \x00DC 45-136    [DC] upper u dieresis
largesign \x00FC   54-136    [FC] lower u dieresis

largesign \x00DD 25-13456  [DD] upper y acute
largesign \x00FD   25-13456  [FD] lower y acute

#largesign \x00DE 4-2345   [DE] upper t horn
#largesign \x00FE   4-2345   [FE] lower t horn

largesign \x00DF 234-234 (DF) lower ss
